Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 3. Practice and Procedure

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 C.J.S. Mechanics' Liens § 270.

§ 29-1-301.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1877, p. 78, § 6, related to Lien statement to be filed; contents; notice; fee.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-302.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1877, p. 80, § 16, related to notice of satisfaction to be filed.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

Cited

in

Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980); Zitterkopf v. Bradbury, 783 P.2d 1142,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 29-1-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 17, related to liability for failure to enter satisfaction.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

Cited

in

Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 29-1-304.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1, related to Rules of Civil Procedure applicable in foreclosure action.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1, related to priority of liens.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-306.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1, related to work or materials furnished considered done under same contract; exceptions.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-307.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1, related to notice of foreclosure to prior perfected lienholders, and effect of failure to notify.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-308.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1, related to remedies not exclusive.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-309.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1, related filing and recording fees.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-310.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 130, § 1, related to bond to satisfy lien; terms of bond; filing and effect thereof; and action upon bond.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-311.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1997, ch. 127, § 1, related to false or frivolous liens; damages; penalties.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-312.
Lien statement to be filed; contents; notice; fee.

In order to have a perfected lien pursuant to this act, a lien claimant shall file with the county clerk a lien statement verifying the accuracy of the lien and the allegations set forth in the lien statement, sworn to and acknowledged by the lien claimant or his authorized representative before a notarial officer. The county clerk shall record and index the lien statement by date, names of claimant and property owner, and legal description of the property.

The lien statement shall contain as appropriate the following information:

The name and address of the lien claimant;

The amount claimed to be due and owing;

The name and address of the record owner against whose property the lien is filed;

An itemized list setting forth and describing materials delivered or work performed;

The name of the person whom the lien claimant alleges is contractually responsible to pay the debt secured by the lien;

The date when labor was last performed or services were last rendered or the date of substantial completion of the project;

The legal description of the property where the materials were furnished or upon which the work was performed; and

A copy of the contract, if available, or a summary of the lien claimant’s contract together with a statement of the location where a copy of the contract, if written, can be obtained.

Notice shall be sent by the lien claimant to the last record owner or his agent in the case of a real property lien within thirty (30) days after the lien statement is filed. The notice shall be in substantially the same format and contain the same information as the form of notice specified in W.S.

29-10-103

. The notice forms shall be made available and may be obtained at the county clerk’s office of each county. Failure to send the notice required under this subsection shall not affect the validity of the lien.

As a fee for recording a lien statement, the county clerk shall collect from the lien claimant the same fee as provided by W.S. 18-3-402(a)(xvi)(P). An irregularity in the lien statement may provide a valid defense for a party defending against the lien. The county clerk shall nevertheless file a lien statement at the date and time received by the county clerk, regardless of any irregularity, illegible language or other reason.

The recording fee under this section may be assessed as costs in any action to foreclose the lien.

The lien statement shall be in substantially the same format and contain the same information as the form specified in W.S.

29-10-104

. The lien statement forms shall be made available and may be obtained at the county clerk’s office of each county.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1; 2013 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “thirty (30)” for “five (5)”, and added the last sentence in (c).

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Application. —

Former statute that required prompt lien notice applies to projects under construction prior to the effective date of the statute requiring 5 days' notice; therefore, a lien was improperly invalidated because prompt notice was given where a week passed that included a weekend and a legal holiday. An argument that a printed version did not contain a session law relating to the effectiveness of the new statute was rejected because enrolled bills governed over incorrect or incomplete printed versions. Elec. Wholesale Supply Co. v. Fraser, 2015 WY 105, 356 P.3d 254,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2015).

Improper filing of attorney's lien. —

Attorney violated professional conduct rules and was suspended for 30 days for misrepresentations in filing a lien statement where the lien was filed under a statute that applied to improvements to real property, and no notice was provided. Moreover, the attorney failed to make any limitation to exclude the assets of a spouse, and she attached an inaccurate and unreasonable billing statement to the sworn lien statement that was filed with a county clerk. Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22, 318 P.3d 790,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2014).

Remedy unavailable unless services received by landowner. —

Where a landowner never actually received anything in the way of permits, fees, connections or service from a water district for which he did not pay, a mechanics' lien is a remedy that the district did not have available. Thus, the court should have dismissed the complaint for failure to assert the statutory mechanics' lien requirements necessary to vest jurisdiction in the court. Robbins v. South Cheyenne Water & Sewage Dist., 792 P.2d 1380,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1990).

Lien statement may be made and signed by attorney of claimant.

Stricker v. Frauendienst, 669 P.2d 520,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 363

(Wyo. 1983).

Description of premises sufficient unless prejudicial. —

Absent any such claim of prejudice or being misled in any manner by the description which appears in the lien statement, the court must hold that it is sufficient. Horseshoe Estates v. 2M Co., 713 P.2d 776 (Wyo. 1986).

§ 29-1-313.
Notice of satisfaction to be filed.

Whenever any debt which is secured by a lien pursuant to this act is paid and satisfied, the lien claimant shall file notice of satisfaction of the lien in the office of the county clerk of any county in which the lien is filed and the lien claimant shall send the record owner a copy of the notice of satisfaction within thirty (30) days. The county clerk shall record and index the notice of satisfaction of the lien. The notice of satisfaction shall be acknowledged, but may be signed by the lien claimant or the attorney for the lien claimant.

The notice of satisfaction shall be in substantially the same format and contain the same information as the notice of satisfaction form in W.S.

29-10-106

. The notice of satisfaction forms shall be made available and may be obtained at the county clerk’s office of each county.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1; 2013 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “thirty (30)” for “five (5)” in (a).

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-314.
Liability for failure to file a notice of satisfaction.

In addition to any actual damages, any lien claimant refusing or neglecting to file the notice of satisfaction as provided in W.S.

29-1-313

within thirty (30) days after payment, and after having received by certified or registered mail a request in writing to file the notice of satisfaction, is liable for damages of not less than one-tenth of one percent (.10%) of the original principal amount of the debt per day from the date the lien claimant receives the written request to file a notice of satisfaction, until the lien claimant files a notice of satisfaction. The damages authorized by this section shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.